Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3278.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; PEOPLE IN ACTION.new text end new text begin $700,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $700,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the Board of Directors of the Minnesota Humanities Center for a grant to the nonprofit organization People in Action for statewide Somali-based collaborative programs for arts and cultural heritage. The funding must be used for arts education, workshops, mentor programs, community presentations, and engagement events throughout Minnesota. new text end